Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8611.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-14-14.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-14 entitled "Taxation
of Banks" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-14-14.1. Apportionment and allocation of income for purposes of taxation.
(a) Except as specifically provided in this chapter a banking institution whose business
activity is taxable both within and outside of this state shall allocate and apportion its net income
as provided in §§ 44-14-14.1 — 44-14-14.5. A financial institution organized under the laws of a
foreign country, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or possession of the United States
whose effectively connected income (as defined under the federal Internal Revenue Code) is
taxable both within this state and within another state, other than the state in which it is organized
shall allocate and apportion its net income as provided in §§ 44-14-14.1 — 44-14-14.5.
(b) All income shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying this income by the
apportionment percentage. The apportionment percentage is determined by adding the taxpayer’s
receipts factor (as described in § 44-14-14.3), property factor (as described in § 44-14-14.4), and
payroll factor (as described in § 44-14-14.5) together and dividing the sum by three. If one of the
factors is missing, the two remaining factors are added and the sum is divided by two. If two of the
factors are missing, the remaining factor is the apportionment percentage. A factor is missing if
both its numerator and denominator are zero, but it is not missing merely because its numerator is
zero.
(c) Each factor shall be computed according to the method of accounting (cash or accrual

basis) used by the taxpayer for the taxable year.
(d) For tax years ending prior to January 1, 2025, if the allocation and apportionment
provisions of §§ 44-14-14.1 — 44-14-14.5 do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer’s
business activity in this state, the taxpayer may petition for or the tax administrator may require, in
respect to all or any part of the taxpayer’s business activity, if reasonable:
(1) The exclusion of any one or more of the factors;
(2) The inclusion of one or more additional factors which will fairly represent the
taxpayer’s business activity in this state; or
(3) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation and
apportionment of the taxpayer’s income.
(e) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, if the allocation and apportionment
provisions of §§ 44-14-14.1 — 44-14-14.5 or subsection (f) of this section are not reasonably
adapted to approximate the net income derived from business carried on within the state, a banking
institution may apply to the tax administrator, or the tax administrator may require the banking
institution, to have its income derived from business carried on within the state determined by an
alternative method. Such application shall be made by attaching to its duly-filed return a statement
of the reasons why the banking institution believes that §§ 44-14-14.1 — 44-14-14.5 or subsection
(f) of this section are not reasonably adapted to approximate its net income derived from business
carried on within the state and a description of the method sought by it. A banking institution which
so applies shall, upon receipt of a request therefor from the tax administrator, file with the tax
administrator, under oath of its treasurer, a statement of such additional information as the tax
administrator may require.
If, after such application by the banking institution, or after the tax administrator’s own
review, the tax administrator determines that §§ 44-14-14.1 — 44-14-14.5 or subsection (f) of this
section are not reasonably adapted to approximate the banking institution’s net income derived
from business carried on within the state, the tax administrator shall by reasonable methods
determine the amount of net income derived from business activity carried on within the state. The
amount thus determined shall be the net income taxable under § 44-14-3 or § 44-14-4 and the
foregoing determination shall be in lieu of the determination required by §§ 44-14-14.1 — 44-14-
14.5 or subsection (f) of this section. If an alternative method is used by the tax administrator
hereunder, the tax administrator, in their discretion, may require similar information from such
banking institution if it shall appear that such alternative method or §§ 44-14-14.1 — 44-14-14.5
or subsection (f) of this section are not reasonably adapted to approximate for the applicable year
the banking institution’s net income derived from business carried on within the state and may
LC006561 - Page 2 of 4

again by reasonable methods determine such income.
(f) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, except as specifically provided in
this chapter a banking institution whose business activity is taxable both within and outside of this
state may elect to allocate and apportion its net income by multiplying its net income by its receipts
factor as described in § 44-14-14.3. For purposes of an election made pursuant to this subsection
(f), the following shall apply:
(1) An election shall be made by filing the form prescribed by the tax administrator with
the taxpayer’s duly-filed return. The election shall take effect in the tax year for which the taxpayer
makes the election and shall remain in effect for all subsequent tax years; except that, after a
minimum of five (5) subsequent tax years after the tax year for which the election is made, in the
event of a material change of facts or law, a taxpayer may apply to the tax administrator to revoke
the election. Such application shall be made by attaching a statement of the event of a material
change of facts or law to the taxpayer’s duly-filed return. A banking institution which so applies
shall, upon receipt of a request therefor from the tax administrator, file with the tax administrator,
under oath of its treasurer, a statement of such additional information as the tax administrator may
require.
(2) If the receipts factor is missing, the whole of the banking institution’s net income shall
be taxable pursuant to §§ 44-14-3 — 44-14-4. The receipts factor shall be missing if both its
numerator and denominator are zero, but it shall not be missing merely because its numerator is
zero.
(3) The receipts factor shall be computed according to the method of accounting (cash or
accrual basis) used by the taxpayer for the taxable year.
(4) A banking institution electing apportionment under this subsection shall not claim any
benefit pursuant to chapter 64.5 of title 42.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and be effective for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
========
LC006561
========
LC006561 - Page 3 of 4